Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-111
State song; Beautiful Nebraska.

The song Beautiful Nebraska with words by Jim Fras and Guy G. Miller and music by Jim Fras is hereby adopted as the Nebraska state song.

Laws 1967, c. 613, § 1, p. 2060;

R.R.S.1943, § 84-728;

Laws 2008, LB728, § 1.